Massachusetts, session 194th, H5296.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 111G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following definitions:-
"Substance-Exposed Newborn", a newborn who was exposed to alcohol or other drugs
ingested by the mother in utero, whether or not this exposure is detected at birth through a drug
screen or withdrawal symptoms.
"Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome", symptoms and signs exhibited by a newborn due to
drug withdrawal, the term used to represent the pattern of effects that are associated with opioid
withdrawal in newborns.
Section 2 of Chapter 111G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
of 2

The department shall review and revise the early intervention operational standards to
ensure that children under the age of 3, who are diagnosed with Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome
and children under the age of 3, who meet the definition of substance-exposed newborns, are
deemed categorically eligible for early intervention services until the child's third birthday.
of 2